Hawaii statutes.
[§521-39] Medical marijuana; tenant use;
eviction. A provision in a rental agreement allowing for eviction of a
tenant who has a valid certificate for the medical use of marijuana as provided
in section 329-123 in any form is void, unless the rental agreement allows for
eviction for smoking tobacco and the medical marijuana is used by means of
smoking; provided that this section shall not apply where the articles of
incorporation, declaration, bylaws, administrative rules, house rules,
association documents, or a similar document of a condominium property regime
or planned community association prohibits the medical use of marijuana. [L
2014, c 60, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next